Missouri, session 2026, HB1867.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.1000, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.1000, to read as follows:
67.1000. 1. The governing body of the following cities and counties may impose a
tax as provided in this section:
(1) Any county;
(2) Any city which is the county seat of any county or which now or hereafter has a
population of more than three thousand five hundred inhabitants and which has heretofore
been authorized by the general assembly;
(3) Any city or county with more than three hundred fifty hotel and motel rooms
within the boundaries of such city or county;
(4) Any other city which has a population of more than eighteen thousand and less
than forty-five thousand inhabitants located in a county of the first classification with a
population over two hundred thousand adjacent to a county of the first classification with a
population over nine hundred thousand.
2. The governing body of any city or county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or
motels situated in the city or county, which shall be not more than five percent per occupied
room per night, except that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of
the city or county submits to the voters of the city or county at an election permitted under
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1867 2
section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city or county to impose a
tax under the provisions of this section and section 67.1002. The tax authorized by this
section and section 67.1002 shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall
be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used
by the city or county solely for funding a convention and visitors bureau which shall be a
general not-for-profit organization with whom the city or county has contracted, and which is
established for the purpose of promoting the city or county as a convention, visitor and tourist
center. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
3. As used in this section and section 67.1002, the term "transient guests" means a
person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less
during any calendar quarter, except that in any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than forty-one thousand one hundred but fewer
than forty-one thousand two hundred inhabitants, "transient guests" means a person or
persons who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or motel for ninety days or less during any
calendar quarter.
4. Provisions of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing body of
any home rule city with more than thirty-nine thousand six hundred but fewer than thirty-nine
thousand seven hundred inhabitants and partially located in any county of the first
classification with more than seventy-one thousand three hundred but fewer than seventy-one
thousand four hundred inhabitants may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms
paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city, which shall be not more
than seven percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not become
effective unless the governing body of such city submits to the voters of the city at an election
permitted under section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to
impose a tax under the provisions of this subsection and section 67.1002. The tax authorized
by this subsection and section 67.1002 shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room
and shall be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall
be used by the city solely for funding a convention and visitors bureau which shall be a
general not-for-profit organization with whom the city has contracted, and which is
established for the purpose of promoting the city as a convention, visitor, and tourist center.
Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
5. (1) This subsection shall apply in any city with more than fifty-one thousand
but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the
governing body of a city described in subdivision (1) of this subsection that imposes a
tax under this section as of the effective date of this section may increase the percentage

HB 1867 3
of the tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or
motels situated in the city.
(3) Such increase in the percentage shall not result in the total percentage of the
tax imposed under this section exceeding six percent per occupied room per night.
(4) Such increase in the percentage shall not become effective unless the
governing body of such city submits to the voters of the city at an election permitted
under section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to increase
the percentage of the tax under the provisions of this subsection and section 67.1002.
(5) Such increase authorized by this subsection and section 67.1002 shall be in
addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any and all taxes
imposed by law. Such increase shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes.
(6) The proceeds derived from an increase approved by the voters after the
effective date of this section shall be used by the city solely to provide moneys for the
construction and maintenance of new capital projects to promote tourism in such city.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the tax authorized in
this section shall not be imposed by the following cities or counties:
(1) Any city or county already imposing a tax solely on the charges for sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in any such city or county
under any other law of this state;
(2) Any city not already imposing a tax under this section and that is located in whole
or partially within a county that already imposes a tax solely on the charges for sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in such county under this
section or any other law of this state; or
(3) Any county not already imposing a tax under this section and that has a city
located in whole or in part within its boundaries that already imposes a tax solely on the
charges for sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in such
city under this section or any other law of this state.
[6.] 7. This section shall not be construed as repealing any taxes levied by any city or
county on transient guests as permitted under this chapter or chapter 94 as of August 28,
2011.
✔